Hawaii statutes.
§121-6 Organization and reorganization of
units. The governor may organize, alter, divide, annex, consolidate, and
reorganize the army and air national guard into divisions, brigades, regimental
combat teams, regiments, battle groups, battalions, squadrons, batteries,
companies, and similar organizations in accordance with their strength as
authorized from time to time and in conformity with the tables of organization
prescribed by the secretaries of the army and of the air force. The governor
may change the location of units, and subject to the approval of the
appropriate secretary, redesignate units or organizations. [L 1967, c 196, pt
of §1; HRS §121-6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next